Maryland, session 2026, HB0988.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0988*

HOUSE BILL 988
Article – Environment
[Subtitle 16. Building Energy Performance Standards.]
[2–1601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Agricultural building” means a structure that is used primarily to
cultivate, manufacture, process, or produce agricultural crops, raw materials, products, or
commodities.
(2) “Agricultural building” includes a greenhouse.
(c) “Building” has the meaning stated in the International Building Code.
(d) “Commercial building” means a building that is subject to the commercial
provisions of the International Energy Conservation Code.
(e) (1) “Covered building” means a building that:
(i) 1. Is a commercial or multifamily residential building in the
State; or
2. Is owned by the State; and
(ii) Has a gross floor area of 35,000 square feet or more, excluding
the parking garage area.
(2) “Covered building” does not include:
(i) A building designated as a historic property under federal, State,
or local law;
(ii) A public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school building;
(iii) A hospital;
(iv) A manufacturing building; or
(v) An agricultural building.
(f) “Critical infrastructure” has the meaning stated in § 1–101 of the Public
Utilities Article.

HOUSE BILL 988 3
(g) “Direct greenhouse gas emissions” means greenhouse gas emissions produced
on–site by covered buildings.
(h) “District energy” means thermal energy generated at one or more central
facilities that produce hot water, steam, or chilled water that then flows through a network
of insulated underground pipes to provide hot water, space heating, air conditioning, or
chilled water to nearby buildings.
(i) “Manufacturing building” means a facility in which manufacturing, as defined
in § 2–1202 of this article, takes place.]
[2–1602.
(a) The Department shall develop building energy performance standards for
covered buildings that achieve:
(1) A 20% reduction in net direct greenhouse gas emissions on or before
January 1, 2030, as compared with 2025 levels for average buildings of similar construction;
and
(2) Net–zero direct greenhouse gas emissions on or before January 1, 2040.
(b) To facilitate the development of building energy performance standards under
this section, the Department shall require the owners of covered buildings to measure and
report direct emissions data to the Department annually beginning in 2025.
(c) (1) On or before June 1, 2023, the Department shall adopt regulations to
implement this section.
(2) Regulations adopted under this section shall:
(i) Subject to items (ii), (iii), (iv), and (v) of this paragraph, include
energy use intensity targets by building type;
(ii) As necessary, include special provisions or exceptions to account
for:
1. Building age;
2. Regional differences;
3. The unique needs of particular building or occupancy
types, including health care facilities, laboratories, assisted living and nursing facilities,
military buildings, critical infrastructure, and buildings used in life sciences as defined in
§ 3–201 of the Economic Development Article;

HOUSE BILL 988
4. The use of district energy systems and biofuels by covered
buildings;
5. Crediting the generation of on–site renewable energy by
covered buildings toward their energy use intensity targets;
6. Crediting the greenhouse gas reduction impact of the
on–site use of biomethane;
7. Excluding the energy use and greenhouse gas emissions
related to the production of steam for sterilization in a health care facility, laboratory,
assisted living and nursing facility, military building, or building used in life sciences; and
8. Excluding the energy use and greenhouse gas emissions
related to the generation of emergency backup power at a health care facility, laboratory,
assisted living and nursing facility, military building, critical infrastructure, or building
used in life sciences;
(iii) Consider the needs of the owners of covered buildings who:
1. Are not responsible for the design, modification, fixtures,
or equipment of commercial tenants;
2. Do not have access to or control over building energy
systems that are used or controlled by commercial tenants; or
3. Own buildings occupied by commercial tenants who are
responsible for all maintenance of and repairs to the buildings;
(iv) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, exempt from energy
use intensity targets a covered building that contains an area designed, built, and operated
as a permanent sensitive compartmented information facility and is operated by an agency
or contractor of:
1. The U.S. General Services Administration;
2. A. The U.S. Department of Defense;
B. The National Security Agency;
C. The U.S. Department of Homeland Security; or
D. Any other U.S. intelligence agency; or
3. The State;

HOUSE BILL 988 5
(v) Exempt an owner of a covered building from energy use intensity
reporting requirements if:
1. The covered building meets the criteria under item (iv) of
this paragraph; and
2. In circumstances where tenant authorization is required,
the tenant or occupant does not provide energy use information to the owner of the covered
building due to concerns about the confidentiality of the building’s secure area;
(vi) Provide maximum flexibility to the owners of covered buildings
to comply with building energy performance standards;
(vii) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, include an alternative
compliance pathway allowing the owner of a covered building to pay a fee for greenhouse
gas emissions attributable to the building’s failure to meet direct greenhouse gas emissions
reduction targets;
(viii) To the extent authorized by law, include financial incentives
recommended by the Building Energy Transition Implementation Task Force; and
(ix) Include an annual reporting fee of $100 per covered building,
adjusted for inflation, to cover the administrative costs of the program.
(3) The Department may not set an alternative compliance fee that is less
than the social cost of greenhouse gases adopted by the Department or the U.S.
Environmental Protection Agency.
(4) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the Department
shall certify a building energy performance standards program adopted by a county
administering a building energy performance standards program on or before March 1,
2025, and waive the requirement for covered buildings in the county to comply with the
statewide program adopted under this section.
(ii) A county administering a building energy performance
standards program certified by the Department under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph
may take appropriate actions to enforce the standards, including:
1. Establishing alternative compliance pathways for
complying with energy use intensity and direct greenhouse gas emissions requirements
established in the standards;
2. Imposing and collecting alternative compliance fees up to
the same amount and in the same manner allowed by the Department under this section;
and

HOUSE BILL 988
3. Imposing and collecting penalties up to the same amount
and in the same manner allowed by the Department under § 2–610 of this title.
(5) Nothing in this section shall preclude a county administering a building
energy performance standards program certified by the Department under paragraph (4)(i)
of this subsection from:
(i) Adopting building energy performance standards for buildings
that are not covered buildings under the statewide program adopted under this section; or
(ii) Modifying an adopted building performance standards program.
(d) Electric companies and gas companies shall provide energy data, including
whole–building and aggregate data, to the owners of covered buildings for benchmarking
purposes.
(e) In calculating the statewide standards developed by the Department under
this section, an owner of a covered building may not consider greenhouse gas emissions or
energy use by a commercial tenant of the covered building that:
(1) Is a food service facility as defined in COMAR 10.15.03.02; and
(2) Engages in commercial cooking and water heating.]
Article – Housing and Community Development
4–211.
(d) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) 1. “Covered building” [has the meaning stated in § 2–1601 of
the Environment Article] MEANS A BUILDING THAT:
A. IS OWNED BY THE STATE OR IS A COMMERCIAL OR
MULTIFAMILY RESIDENTIAL BUILDING IN THE STATE; AND
B. HAS A GROSS FLOOR AREA OF 35,000 SQUARE FEET
OR MORE, EXCLUDING THE PARKING GARAGE AREA.
2. “COVERED BUILDING” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
A. A BUILDING DESIGNATED AS A HISTORIC PROPERTY
UNDER FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL LAW;

HOUSE BILL 988 7
B. A PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC ELEMENTARY OR
SECONDARY SCHOOL BUILDING;
C. A MANUFACTURING BUILDING; OR
D. AN AGRICULTURAL BUILDING.
(iii) “Energy conservation project” means a project that qualifies
under § 4–218 of this subtitle.
(2) For the purpose of reducing direct greenhouse gas emissions from
multifamily residential buildings [in accordance with the standards adopted under §
2–1602 of the Environment Article], the Administration shall develop and implement a
program to provide grants and loans for energy conservation projects and projects to install
renewable energy generating systems in covered buildings that house primarily low– to
moderate–income households.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The
publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note following
the section affected.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.